California, session 20252026, SB1381.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 48980.2 is added to the Education Code, to read:48980.2. The notification required pursuant to Section 48980 for the parent or guardian of a pupil who is deaf, hard of hearing, blind, visually impaired, or deaf-blind shall include information regarding the option for the pupil to attend the California School for the Deaf pursuant to Section 59020 or to attend the California School for the Blind pursuant to Section 59120, as applicable. The information provided shall also state that this option is one of the placements available to the pupil and that the parent or guardian may request more information about additional placement options available to the pupil pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 56040.6.SEC. 2. Section 56040.7 is added to the Education Code, to read:56040.7. (a) Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, if a local educational agency develops, reviews, or revises an individualized education program for a pupil who is deaf, hard of hearing, blind, visually impaired, or deaf-blind, the individualized education program team of the local educational agency shall provide the pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder with information about the California School for the Deaf or the California School for the Blind, as applicable, as provided by the department pursuant to subdivision (b). (b) and the option for the pupil to attend one of those schools. The information provided shall also state that this option is one of the placements available to the pupil and that the parent or guardian may request more information about additional placement options available to the pupil pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 56040.6.(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall provide local educational agencies with information about the California School for the Deaf and the California School for the Blind to be used pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.